Florida, session 2026, SB34.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âPresent subsection (3) of section 267.21, 31 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (4), and a new 32 subsection (3) is added to that section, to read: 33 267.21âHistoric Cemeteries Program.â 34 (3)âIf a historic African-American cemetery with excess 35 vacant land sells or enters into a contract to sell such land 36 for the express purpose of funding the cemeteryâs long-term 37 maintenance and upkeep, the local government where such cemetery 38 is located must approve an application to change the land use 39 designation and zoning of such land to match the most permissive 40 land use category and zoning district adjacent to the excess 41 property. 42 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.